Wyoming, session 2025, HB0313.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 24-2-109 by creating a new subsection
(c) and 31-5-303(b), (d) and by creating a new subsection
(f) are amended to read:
HB0313

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0481

24-2-109. Designation of state highways; vesting of
county interest in state; commission authorized to acquire
severed portions of land; land to be sold; overriding
maximum speed limits.

(c) The commission shall have the authority to
override, by a majority vote of the commission, a board of
county commissioners' adopted resolution to decrease the
maximum speed limit under W.S. 31-5-303(f). The commission
may override an adopted resolution not more than sixty (60)
days after receipt of the resolution. If the commission
takes no action under this subsection within sixty (60)
days after receipt of the resolution then the commission
waives its ability to override the resolution.

31-5-303. Establishing maximum speed limits by local
authorities.

(b) In compliance with rules promulgated by the
department and subsection (f) of this section, local
authorities in their respective jurisdictions may determine
the proper maximum speed for all streets and highways
HB0313

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0481
within their respective corporate jurisdiction which
maximum speed is reasonable and safe and which may be
greater or less than the maximum speed permitted under this
act. The rules promulgated by the department shall adopt
standards consistent with national practices.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of
this section, any alteration of maximum limits on state
highways or extensions thereof in a municipality by local
authorities is not effective until the alteration has been
approved by the superintendent.

(f) Counties may decrease the maximum speed limit for
any streets or highways as defined by W.S.
31-5-102(a)(xlix) and state highways as defined by W.S.
31-18-101(a)(xvii), that are not interstate highways as
defined by W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi) within their respective
corporate jurisdiction if the board of county commissioners
has adopted a resolution to decrease the maximum speed
limit. The board of county commissioners shall submit an
adopted resolution to decrease the maximum speed limit
under this subsection to the commission not more than sixty
(60) days after the resolution has been adopted. The
HB0313

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0481
maximum speed limit shall not be decreased if the
commission overrides the adopted resolution pursuant to
W.S. 24-2-109(c).

Section 2. This act shall apply to proposed changes
to decrease maximum speed limits by the board of county
commissioners on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0313